California statutes. Education Code
 California Code of Regulations. The moratorium imposed by this subdivision does not apply to injunctive relief and is applicable only if the local educational agency has appropriately, and in a timely manner, apprised the complainant of their right to file a complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 3.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

262.4.

This chapter may be enforced through a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 [270. - 270.]

270.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 632 of the Penal Code, a parent or guardian or local educational agency shall have the right to audio record the proceedings of meetings and any team meetings held pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794). The parent or guardian or local educational agency shall notify the members of the team of the parent’s, guardian’s, or local educational agency’s intent to audio record a meeting at least 24 hours before the meeting. If the local educational agency initiates the notice of intent to audio record a meeting and the parent or guardian objects or refuses to attend the meeting because it will be audio recorded, the meeting shall not be audio recorded.

(b) For purposes of
 this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or any other educational entity that is subject to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 81, Sec. 1.   (AB 87)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Notification [280. - 280.]

280.

(a) By October 1 of each year, the department shall issue a management bulletin to all local educational agencies describing the protections, requirements, and responsibilities prescribed in Sections 244, 262.3, 48980, 51500, 51501, 60151, and 60152, and in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 33800) of Part 20 of Division 2 of Title 2.

(b) The Superintendent, in consultation with the executive director of the state board and the Antisemitism Prevention Coordinator established pursuant to Section 33803.1, shall develop and maintain a distinct internet web page containing resources and information specific to antisemitism on its internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 4.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. English Language Education for Immigrant Children [300. - 340.]



  ARTICLE 1. Findings and Declarations [300. - 300.]

300.

The people of California find and declare as follows:

(a) Whereas, The English language is the national public language of the United States of America and of the State of California, is spoken by the vast majority of California residents, and is also the leading world language for science and technology, thereby being an important language of economic opportunity; and

(b) Whereas, All parents are eager to have their children master the English language and obtain a high-quality education, thereby preparing them to fully participate in the American Dream of economic and social advancement; and

(c) Whereas, California is home to thousands of multinational businesses that must communicate daily with associates around the world; and

(d) Whereas, California employers across all sectors, both public and private, are actively recruiting multilingual employees because of their ability to forge stronger bonds with customers, clients, and business partners; and

(e) Whereas, Multilingual skills are necessary for our country’s national security and essential to conducting diplomacy and international programs; and

(f) Whereas, California has a natural reserve of the world’s largest languages, including English, Mandarin, and Spanish, which are critical to the state’s economic trade and diplomatic efforts; and

(g) Whereas, California has the unique opportunity to provide all parents with the choice to have their children educated to high standards in English and one or more additional languages, including Native American languages, thereby increasing pupils’ access to higher education and careers of their choice; and

(h) Whereas, The government and the public schools of California have a moral obligation and a constitutional duty to provide all of California’s children, regardless of their ethnicity or national origin, with the skills necessary to become productive members of our society, and of these skills, literacy in the English language is among the most important; and

(i) Whereas, The California Legislature approved, and the Governor signed, a historic school funding reform that restructured public education funding in a more equitable manner, directs increased
 resources to improve English language acquisition, and provides local control to school districts, county offices of education, and schools on how to spend funding through the local control funding formula and local control and accountability plans; and

(j) Whereas, Parents now have the opportunity to participate in building innovative new programs that will offer pupils greater opportunities to acquire 21st century skills, such as multilingualism; and

(k) Whereas, All parents will have a choice and voice to demand the best education for their children, including access to language programs that will improve their children’s preparation for college and careers, and allow them to be more competitive in a global economy; and

(l) Whereas, Existing law places constraints on teachers and schools, which have deprived many
 pupils of opportunities to develop multilingual skills; and

(m) Whereas, A large body of research has demonstrated the cognitive, economic, and long-term academic benefits of multilingualism and multiliteracy.

(n) Therefore, It is resolved that: amendments to, and the repeal of, certain provisions of this chapter at the November 2016 statewide general election will advance the goal of voters to ensure that all children in California public schools shall receive the highest quality education, master the English language, and access high-quality, innovative, and research-based language programs that provide the California Ed.G.E. (California Education for a Global Economy).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (SB 1174)   Approved in Proposition 58 at the November 8, 2016, election.   Operative July 1, 2017, by Sec. 9 of Proposition 58.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. English Language Education [305. - 306.]

305.

(a) (1) As part of the parent and community engagement process required for the development of a local control and accountability plan pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2, school districts and county offices of education shall solicit input on, and shall provide to pupils, effective and appropriate instructional methods, including, but not limited to, establishing language acquisition programs, as defined in Section 306. This requirement is intended to ensure that all pupils, including English learners and native speakers of English, have access to the core academic content standards, including the English language development standards, as applicable, and become proficient in English pursuant to the state priorities identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 52060 and of Section 52066.

(2) School districts and county offices of education shall, at a minimum, provide
 English learners with a structured English immersion program, as specified in Section 306, for purposes of ensuring that English learners have access to the core academic content standards, including the English language development standards, and become proficient in English pursuant to the state priorities identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 52060 and of Section 52066.

(b) When a school district or a county office of education establishes a language acquisition program pursuant to this section, the school district or county office of education shall consult with the proper school personnel, including, but not limited to, administrators and certificated teachers with the appropriate authorizations and experience.

(c) School districts and county offices of education are also encouraged to provide opportunities to pupils who are native speakers of English to
 be instructed in another language to a degree sufficient to produce proficiency in that language. The non-English language should be at the discretion of the parents, community, and school, depending upon the linguistic and financial resources of the school community and other local considerations.

(d) A language acquisition program established pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of Section 310.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 2.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Note: This section was amended in Prop. 58 on Nov. 8, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

306.

The definitions of the terms used in this article and in Article 1 (commencing with Section 300) are as follows:

(a) “English learner” means a pupil who is “limited English proficient” as that term is defined in the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 7801(25)).

(b) “Native speaker of English” means a pupil who has learned and used English in his or her home from early childhood and English has been his or her primary means of concept formation and communication.

(c) “Language acquisition programs” refers to educational programs designed to ensure English
 acquisition as rapidly and as effectively as possible, and that provide instruction to pupils on the state-adopted academic content standards, including the English language development standards. The language acquisition programs provided to pupils shall be informed by research and shall lead to grade level proficiency and academic achievement in both English and another language. Language acquisition programs may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Dual-language immersion programs that provide integrated language learning and academic instruction for native speakers of English and native speakers of another language, with the goals of high academic achievement, first and second language proficiency, and cross-cultural understanding.

(2) Transitional or developmental programs for English learners that provide instruction to pupils that utilizes English and
 a pupil’s native language for literacy and academic instruction and enables an English learner to achieve English proficiency and academic mastery of subject matter content and higher order skills, including critical thinking, in order to meet state-adopted academic content standards.

(3) Structured English immersion programs for English learners in which nearly all classroom instruction is provided in English, but with curriculum and a presentation designed for pupils who are learning English.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 753, Sec. 4.   (SB 1174)   Approved in Proposition 58 at the November 8, 2016, election.   Operative July 1, 2017, by Sec. 9 of Proposition 58.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Parental Exceptions [310. - 310.]

310.

(a) Parents or legal guardians of pupils enrolled in the school may choose a language acquisition program that best suits their child pursuant to this section. Schools in which the parents or legal guardians of 30 pupils or more per school or the parents or legal guardians of 20 pupils or more in any grade request a language acquisition program that is designed to provide language instruction shall be required to offer such a program to the extent possible, based upon the requirements of Section 305.

(b) If a school district implements a language acquisition program pursuant to this section, it shall do both of the following:

(1) Comply with the kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, class size requirements specified in Section 42238.02.

(2) Provide, as part of the annual parent notice required pursuant to Section 48980 or upon enrollment, the parent or legal guardian of a minor pupil with information on the types of language programs available to pupils enrolled in the school district, including, but not limited to, a description of each program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 753, Sec. 5.   (SB 1174)   Approved in Proposition 58 at the November 8, 2016, election.   Operative July 1, 2017, by Sec. 9 of Proposition 58.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. English Language Proficiency Assessment [313. - 314.]

313.

(a) Each school district that has one or more pupils who are English learners, and, to the extent required by federal law, each county office of education and each charter school, shall assess the English language development of each pupil in order to determine the level of proficiency for purposes of this chapter.

(b) The department, with the approval of the state board, shall establish procedures for conducting the assessment required pursuant to subdivision (a) and for the reclassification of a pupil from English learner to English proficient.

(c) Commencing with the 2000–01 school year until subdivision (d) is implemented,
 the assessment shall be conducted upon initial enrollment, and annually, thereafter, during a period of time determined by the Superintendent and the state board. The annual assessments shall continue until the pupil is redesignated as English proficient. The assessment shall primarily use the English language development test identified or developed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(d) (1) This subdivision shall not be implemented unless and until the department receives written documentation from the United States Department of Education that federal law permits the implementation of the changes set forth in this subdivision or until the 2013–14 school year,
 whichever occurs later.

(2) The summative assessment shall be conducted annually during a four-month period after January 1 determined by the Superintendent with the approval of the state board. Annual assessments shall continue until the pupil is redesignated as English proficient. The annual assessment shall primarily use the English language development assessment identified or developed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(3) The assessment for initial identification shall be conducted upon the initial enrollment of a pupil in order to provide information to be used to determine if the pupil is an English learner.

(A) If the initial enrollment of a pupil occurs on a date outside of the testing period identified pursuant to paragraph (2), the prior year’s annual assessment for the grade in which the pupil is enrolling shall be used for this purpose.

(B) If the initial enrollment of a pupil occurs on a date within the testing period identified pursuant to paragraph (2), the initial assessment of the pupil shall be conducted as part of the annual assessment conducted pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a school district shall assess the English language development of a pupil pursuant to this section no more than one time per school year for each assessment purpose pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section
 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(e) The assessments conducted pursuant to subdivision (d) shall be conducted in a manner consistent with federal statutes and regulations.

(f) (1) An English learner pupil who, on the 2025–26 or 2026–27
 administration of a summative assessment, meets the score established by the state board for purposes of reclassification on the assessment identified or developed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2, or, if applicable, meets the score established by the state board for purposes of reclassification on the statewide alternate assessment for English language proficiency developed pursuant to Section 11518.30 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be reclassified as English proficient. The pupil shall be considered reclassified as English proficient as of the
 day after the pupil demonstrated proficiency through one of these assessments.

(2) A pupil who, on the 2025–26 administration of a summative assessment, met the requirements of subparagraph (1) and did not reclassify in the 2025–26 school year, shall be reclassified as English proficient on or before January 31, 2027, by the local educational agency, as specified in subparagraph (1).

(g) This section does not preclude a school district or county office of education from testing English learners more than once in a school year if the school district or county office of education chooses to do so.

(h) For purposes of this
 section, “initial enrollment” does not include enrollment in a transitional kindergarten program.

(i) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 619, Sec. 2.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 27, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 619.)
-------------------------------------------

313.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that federal law requires states to establish and implement standardized statewide reclassification procedures for English learner pupils to enter and exit from English learner programs, services, and status (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6821 et seq.). This section, Sections 313.3 and 313.4, and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.33 include the state’s standardized entry and exit procedures.

(b) Each
 school district that has one or more pupils who are English learners, and, to the extent required by federal law, each county office of education and each charter school, shall assess the English language development of each pupil in order to determine the level of proficiency for purposes of this chapter.

(c) The department, with the approval of the state board, shall establish procedures for conducting the assessment required pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) (1) The assessment shall be conducted upon initial enrollment, and annually thereafter, during a period of time determined by the Education
 Commissioner and the state board. The annual assessments shall continue until the pupil is redesignated as English proficient. The assessment shall use the English language development test identified or developed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2 or the statewide alternate assessment for English language proficiency pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11518.30 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The determination of a pupil’s eligibility to take the statewide alternate assessment for English language proficiency pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11518.30 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations may be made before a determination that the pupil
 is eligible to take the alternate performance assessment in English language arts or mathematics, as authorized by Section 60640.

(e) (1) The summative assessment shall be conducted annually during a four-month period after January 1 determined by the Education Commissioner with the approval of the state board. Annual assessments shall continue until the pupil is redesignated as English proficient. The annual assessment shall primarily use the English language development assessment identified or developed pursuant to Chapter 7
 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2 or the statewide alternate assessment for English language proficiency pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11518.30 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The assessment for initial identification shall be conducted upon the initial enrollment of a pupil in order to provide information to be used to determine if the pupil is an English learner.

(A) If the initial enrollment of a pupil occurs on a date outside of the testing period identified pursuant to paragraph (1), the prior year’s annual assessment for the grade in which the pupil is enrolling shall be used for this purpose.

(B) If the initial enrollment of a pupil occurs on a
 date within the testing period identified pursuant to paragraph (1), the initial assessment of the pupil shall be conducted as part of the annual assessment conducted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a school district shall assess the English language development of a pupil pursuant to this section no more than one time per school year for each assessment purpose pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2 or subdivision (c) of Section 11518.30 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(f) The assessments conducted pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be conducted in a manner consistent with federal statutes and regulations.

(g) This
 section does not preclude a school district or county office of education from testing English learners more than once in a school year if the school district or county office of education chooses to do so.

(h) For purposes of this section, “initial enrollment” does not include enrollment in a transitional kindergarten program.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 27, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

313.1.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) (1) “Long-term English learner” means an English learner to which all of the following apply:

 (A) Is enrolled in any of grades 6 to 12, inclusive.

(B) Has been enrolled in schools in the United States for six years or more.

(C) Has remained at the same English language proficiency level for two or more consecutive prior years, or has regressed to a lower English language proficiency level, as determined by the English language development test identified or developed pursuant to Section 60810, or a score determined by the Superintendent on
 any successor test.

(D) For a pupil in any of grades 6 to 9, inclusive, has scored far below basic or below basic on the prior year’s English language arts standards-based achievement test administered pursuant to Section 60640, or a score determined by the Superintendent on any successor test.

(2) A pupil for which the required testing results are not available for either subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (1) shall not have that criteria applied and such pupil shall not be excluded based
 on that criteria.

(b) (1) “English learner at risk of becoming a long-term English learner” means an English learner to which all of the following apply:

(A) Is enrolled in any of grades 3 to 12, inclusive.

(B) Has been enrolled in schools in the United States for four to five years.

(C) Has scored at the intermediate level or below on the prior year’s English language development test identified or developed pursuant to Section 60810, or a score determined by the Superintendent on any successor test.

(D) For a pupil in any of grades 3 to 9, inclusive, has scored in the fourth or fifth year at the below basic or far below basic level on the prior year’s English language arts standards-based achievement test administered pursuant to Section 60640, or a score determined by the Superintendent on any successor test.

(2) A pupil for which the required testing results are not available for either subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (1) shall not have that criteria applied and such pupil shall not be excluded based on that criteria.

(3) The Superintendent is encouraged to revisit a score determined for any successor test pursuant to subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (1) of this subdivision after three years of assessment data on the successor test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 660, Sec. 1.   (SB 750)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

313.2.

(a) The department shall annually ascertain the number of pupils in each school district and school, including a school that is within the jurisdiction of a county office of education and a charter school, who are, or are at risk of becoming, long-term English learners, as those terms are defined in Section 313.1.

(b) The department shall annually provide the information described in subdivision (a) to school districts and schools and post on the department’s Internet Web site the number of long-term English learners and English learners at risk of becoming long-term English learners in the state.

(c) In
 addition to the information specified in subdivision (b) of Section 440, the notice of assessment of a child’s English proficiency shall also contain all of the following information:

(1) Whether the child is a long-term English learner or English learner at risk of becoming a long-term English learner, as those terms are defined in Section 313.1.

(2) The manner in which the program for English language development instruction will meet the educational strengths and needs of long-term English learners or English learners at risk of becoming long-term English learners.

(3) The manner in which the program for English language development instruction will help long-term English learners or English learners at risk of
 becoming long-term English learners develop English proficiency and meet age-appropriate academic standards.

(d) A local educational agency or charter school may, to comply with the requirements of subdivision (c), send a notice to parents and guardians that identifies pupils as long-term English learners or English learners at risk of becoming long-term English learners, including pupils in addition to those who meet the definitions in Section 313.1, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The definitions used by the local educational agency or charter school are broader than those in Section 313.1 and consequently include all pupils who meet the definitions in Section
 313.1.

(2) The notice states that the definitions used by the local educational agency or charter school are broader than those in state law.

(3) The notice includes the information specified in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   (AB 81)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

313.3.

(a) When a pupil is initially determined to be an English learner pursuant to Section 313, the school district, county office of education, or charter school shall communicate to the pupil’s parent or guardian in a clear, concise, and comprehensible manner, and, if applicable, translated into the parent or guardian’s primary language pursuant to Section 48985, all of the following information regarding the parent or guardian’s child:

(1) Their child has been classified as an English learner.

(2) California’s vision of success for English learners is that they attain high levels of English proficiency, mastery of
 grade level standards, and have opportunities to develop proficiency in multiple languages. California’s schools value the culture and language that their child brings to their education.

(3) They are encouraged to engage as a partner with the school in supporting their child’s language development and may request meetings with their child’s teachers to discuss their child’s progress.

(4) Their child is entitled to special support in order to help them learn English and succeed in school.

(5) Each year, their child will take an assessment to measure their progress toward becoming proficient in English. The results of the assessment will be used to determine if their child is ready to become reclassified as English
 proficient. After their child is reclassified, their progress will continue to be monitored for four years.

(6) (A) Their child’s reclassification as English proficient is an important accomplishment and may be seen as a step on the path to becoming literate in two languages, also known as biliteracy.

(B) If their child becomes biliterate, they may be eligible to earn the State Seal of Biliteracy, which is a special recognition in the form of a seal affixed to their high school diploma.

(b) The notice required pursuant to subdivision (a) may be provided at the same time as the notice required pursuant to Section 440, as applicable.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 619, Sec. 5.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 27, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

313.4.

(a) All English learner pupils, including those with or without disabilities, are eligible to reclassify from English learner to English proficient when they meet the requirements of this section or Section 313.5.

(b) (1) (A) An English learner pupil shall be reclassified as English proficient when the pupil meets the score established by the state board for purposes of reclassification on the assessment identified or developed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2, or, if applicable, the pupil meets the score established by the state board for purposes of reclassification on the statewide alternate assessment for English language proficiency developed pursuant to Section 11518.30 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. The pupil shall be considered reclassified as English proficient as of the day after the pupil demonstrated proficiency through one of these assessments.

(B) A pupil who, on the 2026–27 administration of a summative
 assessment, met the requirements of subdivision (f) of Section 313, as that section read on June 30, 2027, and did not reclassify in the 2026–27 school year, shall be reclassified as English proficient on or before January 31, 2028, by the local educational agency, as specified in that subdivision.

(2) (A) As pupil scores specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) become available, the department shall record the pupils who meet the requirements of
 subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) as reclassified in the appropriate data system.

(B) After a pupil has been recorded as reclassified in the appropriate data system pursuant to subparagraph (A), a local educational agency shall do both of the following, as applicable:

(i) Ensure that the pupil’s instructional program and placement reflects that the pupil is a reclassified pupil. This includes, but is not limited to, making any necessary course placement adjustments for pupils in, or entering into, middle school or high school for the subsequent academic year to reflect the change in status.

(ii) Communicate to the pupil’s parent or guardian, and, if applicable, translated into the parent or
 guardian’s primary language pursuant to Section 48985, that their child has been reclassified and provide information about the pupil’s potential opportunity to earn the State Seal of Biliteracy.

(C) After a pupil has been reclassified as English proficient, the pupil shall not be classified as an English learner.

(3) Local educational agencies are encouraged to recognize a pupil and the pupil’s family for the pupil’s accomplishment of achieving proficiency in English and encourage the pupil to pursue a course of study leading to biliteracy and a State Seal of Biliteracy, if offered by the local educational agency.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of
 education, charter school, or state special school for the blind or the deaf.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 619, Sec. 6.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 27, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

313.5.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that California has established alternate coursework and performance tasks for educators to use for pupils with disabilities so that they may demonstrate completion of the state graduation requirements through alternate means and earn a high school diploma.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to enable the pupils described in paragraph (1) to demonstrate proficiency in English, in whole or in part, for purposes of reclassification, through alternate means aligned to the domains assessed by the English language development test identified or developed
 pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(b) (1) Commencing July 1, 2028, and subject to the availability of the development of rubrics and sample alternate pupil work and performance tasks pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.33, if an English learner pupil has an individualized education program, the pupil may be eligible to be reclassified as English proficient by the local educational agency if all of the following are true for the pupil:

(A) Received English language
 development instruction that would reasonably be expected to result in English proficiency but has not achieved the proficiency level required for purposes of reclassification on the assessment identified or developed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2, or, if applicable, the statewide alternate assessment for English language proficiency pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11518.30 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Used all designated supports and accommodations and any domain exemptions in accordance with the pupil’s individualized education program or plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).

(C) Scored an overall performance level that is one level below the level established by the state board for purposes of reclassification on the most recent administration of the assessment identified or developed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2, or, if applicable, received any score on the statewide alternate assessment for English language proficiency pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11518.30 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) (A) (i) If a pupil meets the criteria pursuant to paragraph (1) and the local educational agency determines through using rubrics
 developed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.33 that the pupil has demonstrated, through new or existing pupil work aligned to the alternate pupil work and performance tasks developed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.33, that the pupil has reached a level of proficiency that is
 comparable to the threshold for reclassification on the English language assessment established pursuant to Section 313 through alternate means, the local educational agency shall report the pupil as reclassified as English proficient to the department as described in subparagraph (B). Documentation of a determination made pursuant to this clause shall be recorded in the pupil’s individualized education program.

(ii) The demonstration in clause (i) may apply to one or more of the domains of the assessment in which the pupil has not shown proficiency, and may be combined with proficient scores in other domains for purposes of meeting the overall threshold for reclassification.

(B) A report by a local educational agency to the department pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be made in a form and manner determined by the department. After receiving a report, the department shall record any pupils in the appropriate data systems as reclassified.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school for the blind or the deaf.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 619, Sec. 8.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

313.6.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that Section 6841(a)(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 11304 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations require local educational agencies to monitor and report on the progress of pupils who have been reclassified from English learner to English proficient, including the number and percentage of those pupils who are meeting challenging state academic standards for each of the four years after those pupils are no longer receiving services in the aggregate and disaggregated by, at a minimum, pupils with disabilities.

(b) (1) Pursuant to federal law, a local educational agency
 shall,
 for a pupil who has been reclassified as English proficient, monitor the pupil’s progress to ensure all of the following:

(A) English proficiency is not a barrier to the pupil’s academic success, which indicates the pupil has not been prematurely reclassified as English proficient.

(B) Any academic deficits the pupil incurred as a result of participation in an English learner program have been remedied.

(C) The pupil is meaningfully participating in the standard instructional program that is comparable to their peers who were never classified as English learners.

(2) The requirements of this subdivision are declarative of existing federal law.

(c) On or before January 1, 2028, the state board shall identify both of the following:

(1) Means of monitoring reclassified pupils for four years after reclassification for purposes of identifying pupils who are not meeting challenging state academic standards after reclassification.

(2) An appropriate instrument to be used for purposes of monitoring the progress of reclassified English learners pursuant to Section 6841(a)(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code who are not meeting challenging academic standards, which is aligned to the English language development standards and performance levels of the assessment of English language development, is appropriate for use by content area teachers at all grade levels, and is
 designed for use with all pupils, including those with individualized education programs. In identifying an appropriate instrument, the state board shall consider the use of the standardized English language observation protocol established pursuant to Section 314.

(d) On or before January 1, 2028, the department shall identify appropriate interventions for pupils who are determined, pursuant to paragraph (1), as needing additional support for their English language in order to progress academically.

(e) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school for the blind or the deaf.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 619, Sec. 9.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

313.7.
